Connecticut, session 2026, SB00177.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
thirty-three million five hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of
which shall be used by the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the city
of Norwich for the construction of a police station.